nl: Materiaal gitaarkap-kussentje: Kurk; Vilt; Schuim; Gel; Leer; Rubber; Siliconen; TPU (thermoplastisch polyurethaan); Overige
lt-LT: Kapodasterio pagalvėlės medžiaga: Kamštiena; Veltinys; Putos; Gelis; Oda; Guma; Silikonas; TPU (termoplastinis poliuretanas); Kita
nb: Materiale for capo-pute: Kork; Filt; Skum; Gel; Skinn; Gummi; Silikon; TPU (termoplastisk polyuretan); Annet
hr-HR: Materijal jastučića za kapodaster: Pluto; Filc; Pjena; Gel; Koža; Guma; Silikon; TPU (termoplastični poliuretan); Ostalo
ko: 카포 패드 소재: 코르크; 펠트; 폼; 젤; 가죽; 고무; 실리콘; TPU(열가소성 폴리우레탄); 기타
sv: Capo-dynans material: Kork; Filt; Skum; Gel; Läder; Gummi; Silikon; TPU (termoplastisk polyuretan); Annat
pt-BR: Material da almofada do capotraste: Cortiça; Feltro; Espuma; Gel; Couro; Borracha; Silicone; TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Outro
tr: Kapo pedi malzemesi: Mantar; Keçe; Köpük; Jel; Deri; Kauçuk; Silikon; TPU (termoplastik poliüretan); Diğer
pt-PT: Material da almofada do capotraste: Cortiça; Feltro; Espuma; Gel; Couro; Borracha; Silicone; TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Outro
es: Material de las cejillas: Corcho; Fieltro; Espuma; Gel; Cuero; Caucho; Silicona; TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Otro
sl-SI: Material blazinice kapice: Pluta; Filc; Pena; Gel; Usnje; Guma; Silikon; TPU (termoplastični poliuretan); Drugo
vi: Chất liệu đệm kẹp tăng tông đàn: Nút bần; Nỉ; Mút xốp; Gel; Da; Cao su; Silicone; TPU (polyurethane nhiệt dẻo); Khác
de: Kapodaster-Padmaterial: Kork; Filz; Schaumstoff; Gel; Leder; Gummi; Silikon; TPU (thermoplastisches Polyurethan); Sonstige
it: Materiale del pad del capo: Sughero; Feltro; Schiuma; Gel; Pelle; Gomma; Silicone; TPU (poliuretano termoplastico); Altro
th: วัสดุของแผ่นรองคาโป้: ไม้ก๊อก; สักหลาด; โฟม; เจล; หนัง; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; TPU (โพลิยูรีเทนเทอร์โมพลาสติก); อื่นๆ
ru: Материал накладки каподастра: Пробка; Фетр; Пеноматериал; Гель; Кожа; Резина; Силикон; ТПУ (термопластичный полиуретан); Другое
fr: Matériau du coussinet du capodastre: Liège; Feutre; Mousse; Gel; Cuir; Caoutchouc; Silicone; TPU (polyuréthane thermoplastique); Autre
fi: Capon pehmusteen materiaali: Korkki; Huopa; Vaahtomuovi; Geeli; Nahka; Kumi; Silikoni; TPU (termoplastinen polyuretaani); Muu
ja: カポパッド素材: コルク; フェルト; フォーム; ジェル; レザー; ラバー; シリコン; TPU (熱可塑性ポリウレタン); その他
sk-SK: Materiál podložky kapodastra: Korok; Plsť; Pena; Gél; Koža; Guma; Silikón; TPU (termoplastický polyuretán); Iný
hu: Kapó párna anyaga: Parafa; Filc; Habszivacs; Gél; Bőr; Gumi; Szilikon; TPU (thermoplastic polyurethane); Egyéb
cs: Materiál podložky kapodastru: Korek; Plsť; Pěna; Gel; Kůže; Guma; Silikon; TPU (termoplastický polyuretan); Jiné
zh-TW: 移調夾墊材質: 軟木; 毛氈; 泡棉; 凝膠; 皮革; 橡膠; 矽膠; TPU (熱塑性聚氨酯); 其他
da: Pudemateriale til Capo: Kork; Filt; Skum; Gel; Læder; Gummi; Silikone; TPU (termoplastisk polyurethan); Andet
bg-BG: Материал на подложката на каподастъра: Корк; Филц; Пяна; Гел; Кожа; Гума; Силикон; TPU (термопластичен полиуретан); Друго
pl: Materiał podkładki kapodastera: Korek; Filc; Pianka; Żel; Skóra; Guma; Silikon; TPU (poliuretan termoplastyczny); Inne
el: Υλικό επιθέματος καποτάστου: Φελλός; Τσόχα; Αφρώδες; Gel; Δέρμα; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; TPU (θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη); Άλλο
zh-CN: 变调夹压弦垫材质: 软木; 毡; 泡棉; 凝胶; 皮革; 橡胶; 硅胶; TPU（热塑性聚氨酯）; 其他
en: Capo pad material: Cork; Felt; Foam; Gel; Leather; Rubber; Silicone; TPU (thermoplastic polyurethane); Other
ro-RO: Materialul pernuței capodastrului: Plută; Pâslă; Spumă; Gel; Piele; Cauciuc; Silicon; TPU (poliuretan termoplastic); Altele